Tennessee, session 114, HB2208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-801(3), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting instead:
(3) "Trustees" means:
(A) The commissioner of finance and administration or the
commissioner's designee;
(B) The chair of the finance, ways and means committee of the senate or
the chair's designee;
(C) The chair of the committee of the house of representatives having
jurisdiction over finance matters or the chair's designee; and
(D) The chair of the board of trustees for the Tennessee consolidated
retirement system or the chair's designee.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2208
012248
- 1 -